Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4306
Hydrated lime, defined.

Hydrated lime shall mean a material made from burnt lime which consists of calcium hydroxide or a combination of calcium hydroxide with magnesium oxide or magnesium hydroxide.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 6.